Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201821-201
Short title.

(MBCA 1.01) Sections 21-201 to 21-2,232 shall be known and may be cited as the Nebraska Model Business Corporation Act.

Laws 2014, LB749, § 1;

Laws 2016, LB794, § 1;

Laws 2017, LB35, § 1.